Washington statutes.
RCW 9.51.030

Misconduct of officer in charge of jury.

Every person to whose charge a jury shall be committed by a court or magistrate, who shall knowingly, without leave of such court or magistrate, permit them or any one of them to receive any communication from any person, to make any communication to any person, to obtain or receive any book, paper or refreshment, or to leave the jury room, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1909 c 249 s 77; RRS s 2329.]